Hawaii statutes.
§323F-22 Annual audit and report;
disclosure of revenue projections; internal performance audit. (a) The
corporation shall engage a certified public accountant to conduct an annual
audit of its financial affairs, books, and records in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. The corporation, in consultation with a
regional system board, may permit or require a regional system board to retain
an audit firm to conduct an independent audit of the regional system. Each
regional system board shall submit the results of the annual audit to the
corporation board within one hundred twenty days after the close of the
regional system board's fiscal year. The corporation shall submit to the
governor and the legislature, within one hundred fifty days after the close of
the corporation's fiscal year, a report that shall include the audited
financial report for that fiscal year for the corporation and each regional
system board.

(b) In addition to the submittal of the audit
required under subsection (a), the corporation, in cooperation with the
regional system boards, shall submit a report to the legislature at least
twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session that shall include
but not be limited to:

(1) The projected revenues for each health care
facility;

(2) A list of all proposed capital improvement
projects planned for implementation during the following fiscal year; and

(3) All reports submitted by regional public health
facility management advisory committees pursuant to section 323F-10(c).

(c) The regional system boards shall prepare a
report for inclusion with the corporation's annual report and audit.

(d) There shall be an annual internal audit of
the management and operations of the corporation and regions. The corporation,
in cooperation with the regional system boards, shall submit a report to the
legislature at least twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session
on the results of the annual internal audit of the management and operations of
the corporation and regions. [L 1996, c 262, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 290, §31;
am L 2009, c 182, §15]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next